Hawaii statutes.
[§588-1.5] Coordination function.
(a) The program shall promote the sharing of information among agencies
providing services to the child and family, for purposes of implementing this
chapter.

(b) All agencies and their providers that have
information regarding the mental, physical health, or other information
relating to the best interest of the child shall share the information among
the agencies working with the child unless otherwise prohibited by federal or
state statute or rule. No agency shall further disclose any confidential
information unless written consent expressly authorizing further disclosure is
obtained from the person who is the subject thereof, or disclosure is permitted
by law. [L 2001, c 219, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next